Massachusetts, session 194th, S981.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 41 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 134. (a) The Executive Office of Housing and Livable Communities shall
establish and implement a comprehensive training program for all elected or appointed members
of municipal boards or commissions that have within their purview land usage. Such training
program shall be developed in consultation with the Massachusetts Citizen Planner Training
Collaborative, the Massachusetts Association of Planning Directors, Massachusetts Association
of Regional Planning Agencies, the American Planning Association, Massachusetts Chapter, the
Massachusetts Housing Partnership, MassHousing, and the office of the attorney general.
Instruction and training shall include, but need not be limited to: fair housing law and municipal
zoning authority and laws Additional training elements may be added at the discretion of the
Secretary.
of 2

(b) Members of said boards and commissions shall complete the comprehensive training
program within 6 months of the beginning of the member’s term and within 4 years of the date of
the member’s last training. A municipality may have annual or bi annual trainings. Membership
on a board or commission shall terminate and a vacancy shall exist if a member fails to complete
the comprehensive training program within the period of time established by this section. A
vacancy on a board that exists as a result of this section shall be filled for the remainder of the
term in the same manner in which the prior appointment or election took place.
of 2